Washington statutes.
RCW 35.96.060

Application of provisions relating to local improvements in cities and towns to chapter.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, the general provisions relating to local improvements in cities and towns including but not limited to chapters 35.43, 35.44, 35.45, 35.48, 35.49, 35.50, 35.53 and 35.54 RCW shall apply to local improvements authorized by this chapter.

[ 1967 c 119 s 7.]